test/src/morphology/V-luggo_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - luggõ: # Verb 'to read' - full paradigm
     luggõ+V+Inf: luggõ

     luggõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lugūb
     luggõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: lugūd
     luggõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lugūb
     luggõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: luggõm
     luggõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: luggõt
     luggõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: luggõbõd

     luggõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: lug
     luggõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: luggõm
     luggõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: luggõt
     luggõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: luggõt
# Since there is no distinction between present and preterite in the forms
# perhaps there is no reason to show this as morphology 
#     luggõ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Sg: lug
#     luggõ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Pl1: luggõm
#     luggõ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Pl2: luggõt
#     luggõ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Pl3: luggõt

     luggõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: lugīz
     luggõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: lugīzt
     luggõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: lugīz
     luggõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: lugīzmõ
     luggõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [lugīzt, lugīztõ]
     luggõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [lugīzt, lugīztõ]

#     luggõ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Sg: lug
#     luggõ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Pl1: luggõm
#     luggõ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Pl2: luggõt
#     luggõ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Pl3: luggõt
     
     luggõ+V+Imprt+Prs+Sg2: lug
     luggõ+V+Imprt+Prs+Pl1: luggõgõm
     luggõ+V+Imprt+Prs+Pl2: luggõgid

     luggõ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: lugūks
     luggõ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: lugūkst
     luggõ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: lugūks
     luggõ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: lugūksmõ
     luggõ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: lugūkstõ
     luggõ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: lugūkstõ

     luggõ+V+Jus+Prs+Sg: luggõg
     luggõ+V+Jus+Prs+Pl: luggõgõd

     luggõ+V+Quo+Prs+Sg: luggiji
     luggõ+V+Quo+Prs+Pl: luggijid
     
     luggõ+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg: luggõb     
     luggõ+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl: luggõbõd
     luggõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: luggõn
     luggõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: luggõnd

     luggõ+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg: lugdõb
     luggõ+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl: lugdõbõd
     luggõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: lugdõd

     luggõ+V+Ger+Ine: luggõs
     luggõ+V+Sup+Ill: luggõm
     
     
#
     vakțõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: vakț
     kittõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: kit
     riddõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: rid
     kutsõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: kuts
     laskõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: lask
     akkõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: ak
     aigõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: aig
     kuoŗŗõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: kuoŗ
     vannõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: van
     pȯļļõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: pȯļ
     pȯimõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: pȯim
     ouŗõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: ouŗ
     keijõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: keij
     aŗštõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: aŗšt
     pȯrtõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: pȯrt
     outõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: out
     tundõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: tund
     oudõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: oud

#luggõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: lugdõd
     vakțõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: vakțõd
     kittõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: kittõd
     riddõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: ridtõd
     kutsõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: kutstõd
     laskõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: lastõd
     akkõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: aktõd
     aigõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: aigdõd
     kuoŗŗõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: kuoŗdõd
     vannõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: vandõd
     pȯļļõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: pȯļdõd
     pȯimõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: pȯimdõd
     ouŗõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: ouŗdõd
     keijõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: keijdõd
     aŗštõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: aŗštõd
     pȯrtõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: pȯrtõd
     outõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: outõd
     tundõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: tundtõd
     oudõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: oudtõd
